Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPETITE FOR CHANGE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Appetite For Change for the Youth Training and Opportunities Program to provide workforce training for local youth in urban agriculture, culinary arts, and leadership development. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end